Florida, session 2026, SB1108.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 26 27 Section 1.âSubsection (1) of section 272.09, Florida 28 Statutes, is amended to read: 29 272.09âManagement, maintenance, and upkeep of Capitol 30 Center.â 31 (1)âFor purposes of this section, the term âCapitol 32 Complexâ means the portion of the Capitol Center commonly 33 referred to as the Capitol, the Historic Capitol, the Senate 34 Office Building, the House Office Building, the Knott Building, 35 the Pepper Building, the Holland Building, the Elliot Building, 36 the R.A. Gray Building, and the associated parking garages and 37 curtilage of each, including the state-owned lands and public 38 streets adjacent thereto within an area bounded by and including 39 Calhoun Street, East Pensacola Street, Monroe Street, East Park 40 Avenue, West Park Avenue Jefferson Street, West Pensacola 41 Street, Martin Luther King Jr. Boulevard, and Gaines Street. The 42 term does not include the Supreme Court Building or the public 43 streets adjacent thereto. The portion of the Capitol Complex 44 existing between and including the Elliot Building and the 45 Holland Building within an area bounded by and including Monroe 46 Street, Gaines Street, Calhoun Street, and East Pensacola Street 47 shall be known as âMemorial Park.â 48 Section 2.âSubsections (3) and (4) are added to section 49 272.12, Florida Statutes, to read: 50 272.12âFlorida Capitol Center Planning District.â 51 (3)âThe Department of Management Services is responsible 52 for the aesthetics of the Capitol Center for visitors. 53 (4)âThe Department of Management Services may close any 54 street within or adjoining the Capitol Complex with the consent 55 of the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of 56 the House of Representatives. 57 Section 3.âParagraph (e) is added to subsection (1) of 58 section 272.121, Florida Statutes, to read: 59 272.121âCapitol Center long-range planning.â 60 (1)âThe Department of Management Services shall develop a 61 comprehensive and long-range plan for the development of state 62 owned property within the Capitol Center. In developing this 63 plan, the department shall consider: 64 (e)âThe security of the Capitol Center and surrounding 65 areas and the need to keep the Capitol Center and surrounding 66 areas safe for visitors. 67 Section 4.âPresent subsection (4) of section 272.16, 68 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (5) and amended, 69 and a new subsection (4) is added to that section, to read: 70 272.16âParking areas within Capitol Center area.â 71 (4)âThe Department of Management Services, in consultation 72 with the Capitol Police, shall establish enhanced security 73 measures to protect members of the Legislature, state officers, 74 employees, and visitors in such parking areas. 75 (5)(4)âThe Department of Management Services shall adopt 76 such rules as are necessary to implement this section carry out 77 the purposes of subsections (1) and (3). 78 Section 5.âSection 943.60, Florida Statutes, is amended to 79 read: 80 943.60âDefinitions.âFor the purposes of ss. 943.60-943.68, 81 the term âCapitol Complexâ means that portion of Tallahassee, 82 Leon County, Florida, commonly referred to as the Capitol, the 83 Historic Capitol, the Senate Office Building, the House Office 84 Building, the Knott Building, the Pepper Building, the Holland 85 Building, the Elliot Building, the R.A. Gray Building, and the 86 associated parking garages and curtilage of each, including the 87 state-owned lands and public streets adjacent thereto within an 88 area bounded by and including Calhoun Street, East Pensacola 89 Street, Monroe Street, East Park Avenue, West Park Avenue 90 Jefferson Street, West Pensacola Street, Martin Luther King Jr. 91 Boulevard, and Gaines Street. The term includes the State 92 Capital Circle Office Complex located in Leon County, Florida. 93 The term does not include the Supreme Court Building or the 94 public streets adjacent thereto. The portion of the Capitol 95 Complex existing between and including the Elliot Building and 96 the Holland Building within an area bounded by and including 97 Monroe Street, Gaines Street, Calhoun Street, and East Pensacola 98 Street shall be known as âMemorial Park.â 99 Section 6.âSection 943.61, Florida Statutes, is amended to 100 read: 101 943.61âPowers and duties of the Capitol Police.â 102 (1)âThere is created the Capitol Police within the 103 Department of Law Enforcement, to serve the safety and security 104 needs of both the legislative and executive branches of state 105 government. It is the intent of the Legislature that the Capitol 106 Police serve as a specially trained and highly effective 107 security and law enforcement agency serving the Capitol Complex 108 and the state. It shall be the primary responsibility of the 109 Capitol Police to protect the security of the Governor, the 110 Lieutenant Governor, the members of the Cabinet, and the members 111 of the Senate and of the House of Representatives, and those 112 employees assigned to assist such state officials in the 113 performance of their official duties, and to ensure their access 114 to buildings and premises within the Capitol Complex, thereby 115 providing for the continuous operation of the government of the 116 State of Florida. It shall also be the responsibility of the 117 Capitol Police to ensure that the Capitol Complex and 118 surrounding areas are safe for members of the Senate and of the 119 House of Representatives and those employees assigned to assist 120 such state officials in the performance of their official 121 duties. 122 (2)âThe Capitol Police shall also provide security and 123 protection for other state officials, employees, and visitors to 124 the Capitol Complex and shall maintain a reasonable degree of 125 safety and security within the Capitol Complex and surrounding 126 areas while ensuring reasonable access to buildings and premises 127 within the Capitol Complex by state officials, employees, and 128 visitors. The Capitol Police shall also ensure that adequate 129 signs and personnel are in place to inform and assist the 130 occupants of and visitors to buildings within the Capitol 131 Complex. 132 (3)âNothing herein limits the ability of the Capitol Police 133 to provide mutual aid to other law enforcement agencies as 134 authorized by law unless such a limitation is expressly included 135 in the operational security plans provided for herein. 136 (4)âThe Capitol Police shall have the following 137 responsibilities, powers, and duties: 138 (a)âTo develop, in consultation with the Governor, Cabinet 139 officers, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 140 House of Representatives, written operational plans for basic 141 and enhanced security measures and actions related to the 142 Capitol Complex. Such plans shall address crime and vagrancy in 143 the streets surrounding the Capitol Complex. Such plans and any 144 changes or amendments thereto may shall not be implemented 145 unless presented in writing in final form to the Governor, the 146 President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 147 Representatives and all three grant their approval in writing. 148 The approval of any officer required herein shall expire 60 days 149 after such officer vacates his or her office, and the written 150 approval of the successor in office must be obtained before 151 prior to the continuation of operations under such plans. Upon 152 the request of the Governor, a Cabinet officer, the President of 153 the Senate, or the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the 154 Capitol Police shall activate previously approved enhanced 155 security measures and actions in accordance with the approved 156 operational plans specific to the requesting officerâs 157 responsibilities and to the facilities occupied by such officer 158 and employees responsible to such officer. Upon an emergency 159 threatening the immediate safety and security of occupants of 160 the Capitol Complex, so declared by the Governor, plans not 161 approved as required by this paragraph may be implemented for a 162 period not to exceed 15 days, provided such plans do not 163 substantially interfere with the ability of the Senate and the 164 House of Representatives to assemble for any constitutional 165 purpose. 166 (b)âTo provide and maintain the security of all property 167 located in the Capitol Complex in a manner consistent with the 168 security plans developed and approved under paragraph (a) and, 169 in consultation with the State Fire Marshal, to provide for 170 evacuations, information, and training required for firesafety 171 on such property in a manner consistent with s. 633.218. 172 (c)âTo develop plans for reporting incidents involving 173 buildings and property within the Capitol Complex, emergency 174 procedures and evacuation routes in the event of fire, security 175 threats, incidents prompting a need for evacuation, acts of 176 terrorism, or natural or manmade disaster and to make such 177 procedures and routes known to those persons occupying such 178 buildings. 179 (d)âTo employ officers who hold certification as law 180 enforcement officers in accordance with the minimum standards 181 and qualifications as set forth in s. 943.13 and the provisions 182 of chapter 110, and who have the authority to bear arms, make 183 arrests, except as may be limited in the security plans 184 established under paragraph (a), and apply for arrest warrants. 185 (e)âTo hire guards and administrative, clerical, technical, 186 and other personnel as may be required. 187 (f)âTo train all officers and other employees in fire 188 prevention, firesafety, emergency medical procedures, and 189 preventing and responding to acts of terrorism. 190 (g)âTo respond to all complaints relating to criminal 191 activity or security threats within the Capitol Complex, or 192 against the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, a member of the 193 Cabinet, a member of the Senate or of the House of 194 Representatives, or an employee assisting such official. 195 (h)âAs provided by the security plans developed and 196 approved under paragraph (a), upon request of the presiding 197 officer of either house of the Legislature, the director may 198 assign one or more officers for the protection of a member of 199 the house served by such presiding officer. Per diem and 200 subsistence allowance for department employees traveling with a 201 member of the Legislature away from Tallahassee shall be 202 computed by payment of a sum up to the amounts permitted in s. 203 112.061 for meals, plus actual expenses for lodging to be 204 substantiated by paid bills therefor. 205 (i)âTo enforce rules of the Department of Management 206 Services governing the regulation of traffic and parking within 207 the Capitol Complex and to impound illegally or wrongfully 208 parked vehicles. 209 (j)âTo establish policies for the organizational structure, 210 principles of command, and internal operations of the Capitol 211 Police, provided that such policies are not inconsistent with 212 the provisions of ss. 943.61-943.68 or the security plans 213 developed and approved under paragraph (a). 214 (k)âTo carry out the transportation and protective services 215 functions described in s. 943.68. 216 (l)âTo provide to the Legislature a report with 217 recommendations to enhance the safety of areas surrounding the 218 Capitol Complex. 219 (5)âOfficers of the Capitol Police may make lawful arrests, 220 consistent with the purposes, responsibilities, and limitations 221 set forth in ss. 943.60-943.68. However, except with the prior 222 approval of the appropriate presiding officer, officers of the 223 Capitol Police shall have no power to prevent the convening or 224 continuation of any meeting of the Legislature, legislative 225 committees, or staff, nor shall they have the power to interfere 226 with the legislative duties or rights of a member of the 227 Legislature, or to interfere with the constitutional duties or 228 rights of the Governor or a member of the Cabinet, except as may 229 be necessary to protect the health and safety of any person from 230 a clear and present danger, or as may be otherwise provided in 231 the security plans developed and approved for fire prevention, 232 firesafety, and emergency medical procedures under paragraph 233 (4)(a). No employee of the Capitol Police shall be permitted in 234 either legislative chamber without the specific permission of 235 the presiding officer of that house of the Legislature, but may 236 enter in the case of an emergency when the presiding officer is 237 not able or available to consent. 238 Section 7.âSection 943.64, Florida Statutes, is amended to 239 read: 240 943.64âEx officio agents.âLaw enforcement officers of the 241 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles, special agents 242 or inspectors of the Department of Law Enforcement, and law 243 enforcement officers of other state agencies, counties, and 244 municipalities are ex officio agents of the Capitol Police, and 245 may, when authorized by the executive director of the department 246 or the executive directorâs designee, enforce rules and laws 247 applicable to the powers and duties of the Capitol Police to 248 provide and maintain the security required by ss. 943.61-943.68, 249 including patrolling the Capitol Complex and surrounding areas. 250 Section 8.âSix full-time equivalent positions, for five 251 officers and one sergeant, are authorized to establish an 252 outreach policing community group within the Capitol Police. 253 Section 9.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.